Hawaii statutes.
[§236E-12] Department to issue release;
final settlement of account. (a) The department shall issue an automatic
release of estate tax liability to the personal representative when:

(1) No estate tax is imposed by this chapter and upon
the receipt of a request for a release, if the release includes the sworn
statement of the personal representative or agent that in fact no taxes are
due; or

(2) The estate taxes due under this chapter have been
paid as prescribed in section 236E-9, and the request for a release includes
the sworn statement of the personal representative that in fact all taxes due
have been paid.

(b) The obtaining of a release shall confer
upon the personal representative sufficient authority to effectuate the
transfer of all property composing the decedent's estate. [L 2012, c 220, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next